Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 17 Management Of State Institutions
25-17-302. Applicability — Cumulative effect.

This subchapter shall apply to and encompass all lands, buildings, and improvements which are owned by each respective state institution which may be owned by the State of Arkansas for the use of the institution, or which may be under the control of the institution but is not to be interpreted as in any way interfering with the ownership and control which is by law vested in the governing board of each institution as to its lands, buildings, and improvements.

The provisions of this subchapter shall be cumulative to any remedies which each institution may possess for enforcing its rules, including its rights to impose sanctions through fees and charges and its rights to discipline, deny service, and expel.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).

Have all the powers provided by law for city police and county sheriffs to be exercised as required for the protection of the respective state institutions and state parks, together with any other duties which may be assigned by the employing institution or department; and

Meet the requirements for certification set out by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training in addition to any institution or department requirements.

The present jurisdictional powers or responsibility of the county sheriffs or city police over the land or property of institutions or persons on the land shall not be ceded to the law enforcement officers of state institutions.

The appointment or designation of institutional law enforcement officers does not supersede in any way the authority of the Division of Arkansas State Police or the county sheriffs or that of the law enforcement officers of the jurisdiction within which the institution or portions of it are located.

Institutional law enforcement officers shall be identified by a shield or badge bearing the name of the state institution.

The institution shall issue an identification card bearing the photograph of the institutional law enforcement officer who shall carry it on his or her person at all times when on duty and display it upon request.

An institutional law enforcement officer's authorization to have and to exercise the powers provided by law for law enforcement officers shall be further evidenced by a letter of appointment issued under the seal of the institution.

The executive head of the institution and the executive head of the department or their designees shall maintain a file containing each institutional law enforcement officer's authorization certificate, the certificate of appointment, and all other certificates and information consistent with the rules of the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training.

The executive head of the state institution or the department shall have the authority to remove an employee from the execution of those designated duties, including the authority to revoke in writing the authorization to serve as an institutional law enforcement officer for the institution or department.

Upon termination of that authority, the person shall no longer possess or exercise the authority of an institutional law enforcement officer.

A copy of all revocations shall be placed in the file described in subdivision (e)(2) of this section.

The Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training shall be notified of any change in an institutional law enforcement officer's status.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment by No. 549 subdivided subsection (c) and made minor stylistic and punctuation changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 1198 inserted “and the executive head of the Arkansas Forestry Commission” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (e)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “executive head of the Department of Parks and Tourism” in (a); and substituted “Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training” in (e)(3)(D).

Patrolman's failure to have his certificate of appointment with him was harmless error and not fatal to the arrest. Smith v. City of Little Rock, 305 Ark. 168, 806 S.W.2d 371 (1991).

An institutional law enforcement officer appointed under the authority of § 25-17-304, except to the extent otherwise limited by the executive head of the state institution or department appointing him or her, shall protect property, preserve and maintain proper order and decorum, prevent unlawful assemblies and disorderly conduct, exclude and eject persons detrimental to the well-being of the institution, prevent trespass, and regulate the operation and parking of motor vehicles upon and in all of the grounds, buildings, improvements, streets, alleys, and sidewalks under the control of the institution employing him or her, which is the institutional law enforcement officer's primary jurisdiction.

(1)An institutional law enforcement officer shall have and exercise police supervision on behalf of the institution and as a law enforcement officer may arrest any person upon or in the institutional law enforcement officer's primary jurisdiction who is committing an offense against any law of the State of Arkansas or against the ordinances of the city in which the institution is located and may deliver that person before any court of competent jurisdiction to be dealt with according to law.

An institutional law enforcement officer may make an arrest for an offense against any law of the State of Arkansas outside his or her primary jurisdiction if the officer:

Official business includes, but is not limited to:

Engaging in intelligence-gathering activity relating to security on the grounds, buildings, improvements, streets, alleys, and sidewalks under the control of the institution employing him or her;

Investigating a crime committed on the grounds, buildings, improvements, streets, alleys, and sidewalks under the control of the institution employing him or her;

Transporting money, valuables, securities, or other valuables on behalf of the institution;

Providing security or protective services for officials or visiting dignitaries to the institution; or

The continuous and immediate pursuit of a person for an offense committed on the grounds, buildings, improvements, streets, alleys, and sidewalks under the control of the institution employing him or her, or in the officer's view.

(1)When an arrest is made outside the institutional law enforcement officer's primary jurisdiction, the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction will be notified promptly and a written report forwarded to the agency no later than the next working day.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “An institutional law enforcement officer” for “He or she” in (b)(1) and (b)(2), and made minor stylistic changes.

Where campus patrolman had witnessed traffic offenses and could form a reasonable belief that the defendant was intoxicated, such firsthand information and fact that he began pursuit within his jurisdiction, demonstrated that the patrolman was well within the bounds of his authority when he pursued the defendant for four blocks in the course of fresh pursuit and made the arrest outside the patrolman's jurisdiction. Smith v. City of Little Rock, 305 Ark. 168, 806 S.W.2d 371 (1991).

History.

Acts 1967, No. 328, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 7-117; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2925.

25-17-303. Enforcement.

The prosecuting attorney or the city attorney, as may be appropriate, shall appear and prosecute all actions arising in any court under the provisions of this subchapter.

All fines which may be collected by any court on account of the violation of §5-40-104 [repealed] or §25-17-307 shall be paid into the same fund as are fines levied for the same or similar violations by the court hearing the matter.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 328, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 7-118.

25-17-304. Appointment and removal of institutional law enforcement officers.

The executive heads of each of the educational, charitable, correctional, penal, and other institutions owned and operated by the State of Arkansas, including the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism and the executive head of the Arkansas Forestry Commission, are authorized to designate and appoint one (1) or more of the employees of the institutions and department, respectively, as an institutional law enforcement officer or officers for the institution or at a state park, or any separate portion of the institution or park, who shall exercise law enforcement officer authority under the laws of this state.

These institutional law enforcement officers shall:

History.

Acts 1967, No. 328, §§ 1, 8; 1971, No. 325, § 1; 1981, No. 805, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 7-112, 7-119; Acts 2007, No. 498, § 2; 2009, No. 549, § 4; 2009, No. 1198, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2926; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6036, 6037.

25-17-305. Institutional law enforcement officer's duties and powers.

An institutional law enforcement officer may summon a posse comitatus if necessary.

Is summoned by another law enforcement agency to provide assistance;

Is assisting another law enforcement agency;

(A)Is traveling to or from any location in the state on official business.

The agency having jurisdiction may choose to take over the investigation or allow the institution or department law enforcement officer to bring the person before a court of competent jurisdiction to be dealt with according to law.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 328, § 2; 1981, No. 805, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 7-113; Acts 2007, No. 498, § 3; 2009, No. 549, § 5.

25-17-306. Institutional law enforcement officers exempt from personal liability.

Any institutional law enforcement officers so appointed and designated and any other institutional employees so authorized executing the duties delegated to them under this subchapter shall not be personally liable for injuries to persons or for damages to property dealt with while acting within the scope of their authorized authority on behalf of the State of Arkansas and its institutions.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 328, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 7-120; Acts 2007, No. 498, § 4.

25-17-307. Policies for motor vehicles on institutional grounds.

Each of the institutions described in § 25-17-301 may adopt and amend policies that provide for the operation and parking of motor vehicles upon the grounds, streets, drives, and alleys under its control, including without limitation:

Limiting the rate of speed;

Assigning parking spaces, designating parking areas and their uses, and collecting charges or fees as rent for those parking spaces.

The charges or fees collected under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section, other than fees for parking or parking passes for athletic events or other special events, do not constitute payment for the providing of any service to the person paying the charges or fees as rent and are exempt from the tax levied under § 26-52-301(3);

Prohibiting parking;

Removing vehicles parked in violation of institutional policies or city ordinances, at the expense of the violator, who shall pay the expense before the vehicle is released;

Instituting a system of motor vehicle registration for the identification and regulation of vehicles regularly using institutional premises, including without limitation a reasonable charge to defray the cost of the system; and

Collecting, under an established system, administrative charges for violations of institutional policies governing motor vehicles, the operation of motor vehicles, and the parking of motor vehicles.

However, an administrative finding of a violation of policies under this section may be appealed to the appropriate district court where the matter shall be heard de novo.

Policies, together with any amendments, that may be adopted by a state institution to regulate the operation and parking of motor vehicles shall be posted online or printed, with copies available at convenient locations at the institution.

Speed limits shall be posted at reasonable intervals, and traffic and parking directions and prohibitions shall be indicated by signs.

Upon the adoption of policies under this section, it shall be unlawful for a person to operate or to park a motor vehicle in violation of policies adopted under this section.

A person who violates or refuses to comply with the policies adopted under this section, if not otherwise regulated by city ordinance, shall be subjected to a reasonable administrative charge provided in the policies adopted under this section.

A person who violates policies adopted under this section while using a motor vehicle registered with the institution, at the option of the institutional law enforcement officer, shall be charged under the institution's system of charges or summoned to appear before a court of competent jurisdiction.

A person adversely affected by an administrative determination of an institution as described under subdivision (e)(1)(A) of this section may appeal the administrative determination to the appropriate district court where the matter shall be heard de novo.

A person who violates policies adopted under this section while using a motor vehicle not registered with the institution or a person who violates city ordinances shall be summoned to appear before a court of competent jurisdiction.

Notice placed on the vehicle is sufficient as a summons for the purposes of subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 256 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the section heading, in (a)(4), in (a)(6), in (d) three times, in (e)(1), and in (e)(2); in the introductory language of (a), deleted “and regulations” following the first occurrence of “rules” and substituted the second occurrence of “rules” for “regulations”; substituted “Institutional rules” for “Rules and regulations” in (b); and inserted “institutional” in (d) three times.

Cited: Markham v. State, 303 Ark. 438, 798 S.W.2d 58 (1990).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 1282, § 1, provided: “Open Data and Transparency Task Force.

“(a)As used in this section, ‘state agency’ means an agency, institution, authority, department, board, commission, bureau, council, or other agency of the State of Arkansas supported by cash funds or the appropriation of state or federal funds.

“(b)(1)The General Assembly finds that:

“(A)State agencies contain great amounts of valuable information and reports on all aspects of life for the citizens of this state, including without limitation health, business, public safety, labor, and transportation data;

“(B)The tremendous amount of data maintained by state agencies can result in the duplication of efforts, data, records, and parts of data and records that may result in the maintenance of inconsistent data and records concerning the same citizen;

“(C)The lack of a quick and efficient delivery system to respond to legislative and executive branch inquiries is harmful to the policy-making process and ultimately costs taxpayers money;

“(D)Progressive states have evolved to become data-driven governments that use data as a strategic asset to improve the delivery of services to the state's citizens and to become more efficient stewards of citizens' data;

“(E)Ensuring the quality and consistency of public data is essential to maintaining the data's value and utility;

“(F)New information technology has fundamentally changed the way people search for and expect to find information and can aggregate large quantities of data to allow the state to provide better information to citizens with increasing efficiency and thoroughness; and

“(G)The state should:

“(i)Evaluate ways to appropriately, efficiently, and securely share data between and within state agencies to allow for quicker, more impactful cross-agency analysis to allow policymakers to make quicker, more informed decisions; and

“(ii)Use the innovations in information technology to enhance public access to public data to make the state more transparent and to promote public trust while eliminating waste, fraud, and abuse in the execution and delivery of government services.

“(2)It is the intent of the General Assembly by this act to enable the Open Data and Transparency Task Force to:

“(A)Evaluate, study, and address the findings contained in subdivision (b)(1) of this section;

“(B)Determine the best practices for the state to achieve the most efficient system for maintaining and delivering the state's public records and data to public officials, government entities, and private citizens; and

“(C)Recommend specific solutions and legislation for an efficient open data and transparency law based upon open data policy principles for state agencies to maintain and share public data that is owned, controlled, collected, or maintained by state agencies.

“(c)The Open Data and Transparency Task Force is created.

“(d)The task force shall consist of the following members:

“(1)One (1) member appointed by the Governor;

“(2)One (1) member appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;

“(3)One (1) member appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

“(4)The Chair of the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs or a member of the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs designated by the chair;

“(5)The Chair of the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs or a member of the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs designated by the chair;

“(6)The House Cochair of the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology or a House member of the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology designated by the House cochair;

“(7)The Senate Cochair of the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology or a Senate member of the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology designated by the Senate cochair;

“(8)The Director of the Department of Finance and Administration or his or her designee;

“(9)The Director of the Department of Health or his or her designee;

“(10)The Director of the Department of Human Services or his or her designee;

“(11)The Director of the Department of Education or his or her designee;

“(12)The Director of the Department of Higher Education or his or her designee;

“(13)The Director of the Department of Correction or his or her designee;

“(14)The Director of the Department of Community Correction or his or her designee;

“(15)The Director of the Department of Information Systems or his or her designee; and

“(16)The Attorney General or his or her designee.

“(e)A vacancy on the task force shall be filled by the appointing authority for the unexpired portion of the term in which it occurs.

“(f)(1)The Governor shall designate his or her appointee to the task force to:

“(A)Call the first meeting of the task force on or before September 1, 2015; and

“(B)Serve as chair.

“(2)At the first meeting, the members of the task force shall elect from its membership a vice chair.

“(3)The task force shall conduct its meetings in Pulaski County at the State Capitol or via teleconference or web conference as technology permits and as desired to allow for scheduling flexibility for its members.

“(4)The task force shall meet at least bimonthly or as decided upon by the task force.

“(g)(1)A majority of the members of the task force shall constitute a quorum for transacting any business of the task force.

“(2)An affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum present shall be necessary to transact business.

“(h)The Department of Information Systems shall provide staff for the task force.

“(i)The task force shall:

“(1)Evaluate, study, and address the findings contained in subdivision (b)(1) of this section;

“(2)Determine the best practices for the state to achieve the most efficient system for maintaining and delivering the state's public records and data to public officials, government entities, and private citizens; and

“(3)Recommend specific solutions and legislation for an efficient open data and transparency law based upon open data policy principles for state agencies to maintain and share public data that is owned, controlled, collected, or maintained by state agencies.

“(j)The task force shall provide a written report by December 31, 2016, to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives containing the results of its findings and activities and its recommendations, including recommendations for proposed legislation.

“(k)The task force expires on January 1, 2017.”

Am. Jur. 66 Am. Jur. 2d, Records, § 1 et seq.

C.J.S. 76 C.J.S., Records, § 93 et seq.

Preambles. Acts 1947, No. 281 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the Board of Fiscal Control recognized the necessity of microfilming invaluable state documents and records as a protection against fire and other hazards, to conserve valuable storage space in the State Capitol Building, and to comply with federal statutes allowing such microfilm records and facisimiles to be admitted as evidence in all courts, departments, bureaus, and commissions, on the same status as the original documents or records; and

“Whereas, the board authorized the purchase of initial equipment and the employment of an operator to inaugurate this program so that the members of the General Assembly could visually examine the program thereby being better able to understand the importance and necessity of its continuance; and

“Whereas, the federal government, other states, and many counties in Arkansas are now microfilming their land and other records and it is highly important that state land and other state records and documents be microfilmed for the use of federal, state, and county officials, and employees, and the public generally;

Now therefore….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1947, No. 218, § 6: Mar. 18, 1947. Emergency clause provided: “There being no provision of law whereby photostatic microfilm or photographic reproductions of writings, documents, or records may be admissible in evidence, and because facilities for storage of public records are now taxed to capacity; and because space must be provided for such public records and because it is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety of the inhabitants of the state; an emergency exists within the meaning of the Constitution and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

ALR.

Privilege accorded state or local governmental administrator of records relating to private individual member of public affecting defamation action. 40 A.L.R.4th 318.

Legitimate research justifying inspection of state or local public records not open to inspection by general public. 40 A.L.R.4th 333.

What constitutes a public record or document within statute making falsification, forgery, mutilation, removal, as other misuse thereof an offense. 75 A.L.R.4th 1067.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1947, No. 218, §§ 1, 2, 4, are also codified as §§14-2-201 —14-2-203.

Cross References. Photographic recording authorized, §16-46-101.

ALR.

Disclosure of Electronic Data under State Public Records and Freedom of Information Acts. 54 A.L.R.6th 653.

Ark. L. Rev.

Documentary Evidence — Arkansas, 15 Ark. L. Rev. 79.

Legislation — No. 235 — Photographic Copies of Documents Held in a Custodial or Fiduciary Capacity Admissible as Evidence (Searcy Woods Harrell, Jr.), 18 Ark. L. Rev. 125.

Authentication and Identification, 27 Ark. L. Rev. 332.

Where photographic copies of an out-of-state marriage license and certificate of marriage were not authenticated they were not admissible. Davis v. Davis, 251 Ark. 423, 473 S.W.2d 172 (1971).

For the purposes of this section, “business” means and includes business, industry, profession, occupation, and calling of every kind.

(1)The head of any business or head of any state, county, or municipal department, commission, bureau, or board may cause any or all records kept by the official, department, commission, board, or business to be photographed, microfilmed, photostated, or reproduced on film. At the time of reproduction, he or she shall attach his or her certificate to the record certifying that it is the original record, and the certificate shall be reproduced with the original.

(1)The photostatic copy, photograph, microfilm, or photographic film of the original records shall be deemed to be an original record for all purposes and shall be admissible in evidence in all courts or administrative agencies.

Whenever photostatic copies, photographs, microfilms, or reproductions on films of public records kept by a state official, department, commission, or board shall be placed in conveniently accessible files and provision made for preserving, examining, and using them, the head of the state department, commission, bureau, or board may certify those facts to the Governor, who shall have the power to authorize the disposal, archival storage, or destruction of the records or papers.

The Secretary of State is authorized and empowered to proceed to have microfilmed any state records and documents which, in his or her opinion, with the advice of the State Board of Finance and the heads of the various state departments, may be of the most importance from an historical and legal point of view.

The microfilm records shall be properly indexed and placed in a fireproof vault which will be available to all department heads, officials, employees, and the public. The operator and supervisor are directed to place the microfilm record of all state documents or records on the microfilm reader machine for the use of any citizens, officials, or employees of the state at their request.

The Secretary of State is charged with the general direction of this microfilming program, provided that the Governor by proclamation may transfer these duties to some other official or department.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 328, §§ 4, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 7-115, 7-116; Acts 2005, No. 2162, § 1; 2007, No. 498, § 5; 2019, No. 256, § 8; 2019, No. 315, § 2927.